Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Definitions.

§ 56-232.
Public utility and schedules defined.

The term “public utility” as used in §§ 56-233 to 56-240 and 56-246 to 56-250:

Shall mean and embrace every corporation (other than a municipality), company, individual, or association of individuals or cooperative, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, that now or hereafter may own, manage or
control any plant or equipment or any part of a plant or equipment within the Commonwealth for the conveyance of telephone messages or for the production, transmission, delivery, or furnishing of heat, chilled air, chilled
water, light, power, or water, or sewerage facilities, either directly or indirectly, to or for the public.

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision 1 of this subsection or subsection G of §

13.1-620

, shall also include any governmental entity established pursuant to the laws of any other state, corporation (other than a municipality established under the laws of this Commonwealth), company, individual,
or association of individuals or cooperative, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever, that at any time owns, manages or controls any plant or equipment, or any part thereof, located within
the Commonwealth, which plant or equipment is used in the provision of sewage treatment services to or for an authority as defined in §

15.2-5101

; however, the Commission shall have no jurisdiction to regulate the rates, terms and conditions of sewage treatment services that are provided by any such public utility directly to persons pursuant to
the terms of a franchise agreement between the public utility and a municipality established under the laws of this Commonwealth.

Except as provided in subdivision 2, shall not be construed to include any corporation created under the provisions of Title 13.1 unless the articles of incorporation expressly state that the corporation is to conduct business as a public service company.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no person, firm, corporation, or other entity shall be deemed a public utility or public service company, solely by virtue of engaging in production, transmission, or sale at retail of electric power
as a qualifying small power producer using renewable or nondepletable primary energy sources within the meaning of regulations adopted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in implementation of the Public Utility Regulatory
Policies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617) and not exceeding 7.5 megawatts of rated capacity, nor solely by virtue of serving as an aggregator of the production of such small power producers, provided that the portion of the output of
any qualifying small power producer which is sold at retail shall not be sold to residential consumers.

No qualifying small power producer, within the meaning of regulations adopted by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, shall be deemed a public utility within the meaning of Chapter 7 (§

62.1-80

et seq.) of Title 62.1.

The term “public utility” as herein defined shall not be construed to include any chilled water air-conditioning cooperative serving residences in less than a one square mile area, or any company that is excluded from the definition of “public utility”
by subdivision (b)(4), (b)(8), (b)(9), or (b)(10) of § 56-265.1.

Subject to the provisions of § 56-232.1, the term “schedules” as used in §§ 56-234 through 56-245 shall include schedules of rates and charges for service to the public and also contracts for rates and charges in sales at wholesale to other public utilities
or for divisions of rates between public utilities, but shall not include contracts of telephone companies with the state government or contracts of other public utilities with municipal corporations or the federal or state government,
or any contract executed prior to July 1, 1950.

History.
Code 1919, § 4067; 1918, p. 413; 1922, p. 887; 1942, p. 20; 1950, pp. 54, 481; 1954, c. 525; 1956, c. 436; 1964, c. 195; 1966, c. 620; 1975, c. 358; 1981, c. 385; 1984, c. 341; 1985, cc. 2, 41; 1990, c. 488; 1999, c. 419;
2000, cc. 528, 543; 2002, c. 813; 2003, c. 172; 2006, c. 411; 2009, c. 746.

Cross references.

For the Utility Facilities Act, see §§ 56-265.1 through 56-265.9.

For definition of “public utility” as used in that act, see § 56-265.1.

Editor’s note.

The Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L. 95-617), referred to in subsection B, is codified generally as 16 U.S.C.S. § 2601 et seq.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 145 C 12 h 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “For the purposes of § 56-232, Code of Virginia, ‘Contracts of Telephone Companies with State Government’ and
for the purposes of § 56-234 ‘Contracts for Service Rendered by a Telephone Company for the State Government’ shall be deemed to include communications lines into public schools which are used for educational technology. The rate structure
for such lines shall be negotiated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Chief Information Officer of the Virginia Information Technologies Agency. Further, the Superintendent and Director are authorized to encourage
the development of ‘by-pass’ infrastructure in localities where it fails to obtain competitive prices or prices consistent with the best rates obtained in other parts of the state.”

The 1999 amendment,
in the second paragraph, in the second sentence, substituted “or sale at retail of electric power as a qualifying small power producer using renewable or nondepletable primary energy sources” for “and sale at retail of electric
power as a qualifying small hydroelectric power producer,” substituted “7.5 megawatts of rated capacity, nor solely by virtue of serving as an aggregator of the production of such small power producers” for “twenty megawatts of rated
capacity,” and substituted “shall not be sold to” for “is sold under contract to no more than five end-users, none of whom may be.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 528 and 543 are identical, and inserted “or (b)(8)” near the end of the second paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 813 inserted the subsection and subdivision designations; in the introductory language of subsection A, deleted “shall”; inserted “shall” at the beginning of subdivision A 1; inserted subdivision A 2; and substituted “Except as
provided in subdivision 2, shall” for “But the term ‘public utility’ as herein defined shall” at the beginning of subdivision A 3.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 172 inserted “however, the Commission shall have no jurisdiction to regulate the rates, terms and conditions of sewage treatment services that are provided by any such public utility directly to persons pursuant to the terms of
a franchise agreement between the public utility and a municipality established under the laws of this Commonwealth” at the end of subdivision A 2.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 411 inserted “(b)(9)” in subsection D and made a related change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 746, in subsection D, substituted “that is excluded” for “which is excluded,” inserted “or (b)(10)” and made a related change.

Law Review.

For article entitled “Regulation of Electric Utilities by the State Corporation Commission,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 589 (1973).

For survey of Virginia law on municipal corporations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1788 (1975).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

Research References.

Accounting for Public Utilities (Matthew Bender). Hahne and Aliff.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
9A M.J. Gas Companies, § 1; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 17.

§ 56-232.1.
Regulation of service by certain gas pipeline companies to municipalities.

Notwithstanding any provision of law the Commission shall regulate, to the same extent as it regulates other public utilities, the utility service furnished to any municipal corporation by a natural gas pipeline transmission company, all of whose facilities
are located within the Commonwealth, and the rates, charges and facilities of such company used to furnish such service.

History.
1985, c. 41.

§ 56-232.2.
Regulation of compressed natural gas service.

The Commission may refrain from regulating and prescribing the rates, charges, and fees for the provision of retail compressed natural gas service provided by corporations other than public service corporations. Wholesale compressed natural gas sales
provided by public service corporations shall continue to be regulated by the Commission to the same extent as are services provided by other public utilities under this chapter. The Commission may adopt regulations implementing this
statute.

History.
1991, c. 263.

§ 56-232.2:1.
Regulation of electric vehicle charging service.

The Commission shall not regulate or prescribe the rates, charges, and fees for the provision of retail electric vehicle charging service provided by any agency as defined in §

2.2-128

, persons, localities, park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

, or school boards other than public service corporations. Sales of electricity by public utilities to an agency as defined in §

2.2-128

, a person, a locality, park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

, or a school board that (i) is not a public service corporation and (ii) provides electric vehicle charging service shall continue to be regulated by the Commission to the same extent as are other services provided by
public utilities. The Commission may adopt regulations implementing this section.

History.
2011, c. 408; 2017, c. 239; 2018, cc. 295, 446; 2019, c. 248; 2020, c. 490; 2022, c. 255.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 2 provides: “That public utilities in the Commonwealth shall (i) evaluate options to develop and offer off-peak charging rates or other incentives to encourage owners of an electric vehicle to charge or recharge its battery during
nonpeak times, when practical, and (ii) file copies of such evaluations with the State Corporation Commission. The State Corporation Commission shall make copies of the evaluations available to the public.”

Acts 2011, c. 408, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission (the Commission) shall, notwithstanding § 56-234 of the Code of Virginia, be authorized to approve, after notice to all affected parties and opportunity for hearing, pilot programs
conducted by public utilities, including programs offering special rates, contracts, or incentives to individual customers or classes of customers to determine the feasibility, and the implications for the public interest, of allowing
public electric utilities to offer time-differentiated rates to users of electric motor vehicles to encourage charging of vehicles during nonpeak periods. Elements of the pilot programs may include voluntary load control options, rate
structures with financial incentives, rebates, or other incentives that offset the cost of purchasing or installing electric vehicle charging equipment for users who elect nonpeak rate structures. Before approving such pilot programs,
including special rates, contracts, and incentives, the Commission shall ensure that such action meets the provisions of subsection B of § 56-235.2 of the Code of Virginia and that such actions are necessary in order to acquire information
which is or may be in furtherance of the public interest. An electric utility that participates in such an approved pilot program shall be entitled to recover annually the costs of its participation in any such pilot program conducted
by the utility on or after January 1, 2011.”

Acts 2018, cc. 295 and 446, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any electric vehicle charging station existing prior to the effective date of this act [July 1, 2018] that is otherwise in compliance with the requirements of
this act.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 239 inserted “or school boards” twice and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 295 and 446 are identical, and inserted “localities, public institutions of higher education, the Department of Conservation and Recreation” or similar language twice; and made stylistic changes. For applicability, see Editor’s
note.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 248 inserted “the Department of General Services, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Transportation” twice.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 490, in the first sentence, inserted “any agency as defined in §

2.2-128

” and deleted “public institutions of higher education, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of General Services, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Transportation” following
“localities”; and in the second sentence, inserted “an agency as defined in §

2.2-128

” and deleted “a public institution of higher education, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of General Services, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Transportation” following
“locality.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 255 inserted “park authority created by a locality pursuant to §

15.2-5702

” in the first sentence and following “locality” in the second sentence.

§ 56-232.3.
Regulation of service by certain gas distribution companies to federal, state and local governmental facilities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 56-232, the Commission shall regulate, to the same extent as it regulates other public utility service, the utility service furnished to any federal, state or local governmental facility by a natural gas distribution
company for which a service area has been determined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, or its predecessor, under Section 717(f)(1) of the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C. § 717(f)(1).

History.
1995, c. 454.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “Section 717(f)(1) of the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C. § 717(f)(1)” for “Section 7f(f)(1) of the Natural Gas Act, 15 U.S.C. § 717 et seq.”

§ 56-233.
Service defined.

The term “service” is used in this chapter in its broadest and most inclusive sense and includes not only the use and quality of accommodations afforded consumers or patrons, but also any product or commodity furnished by any public utility and equipment,
apparatus, appliances and facilities devoted to the purposes in which such public utility is engaged and to the use and accommodation of the public.

History.
Code 1919, § 4068; 1980, c. 249.